Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202023-3527
Retirement system; option to participate in County Employees Retirement Act.

A facility established under the provisions of section 23-3501, in a county eligible to participate in the County Employees Retirement Act pursuant to Chapter 23, article 23, shall be given the option to participate in the retirement system under such act so long as the facility elects to participate within the later of one year from July 19, 2018, or one year from the date the facility is established. Failure to timely elect to participate in such retirement system shall bar the facility from electing to participate in the future.

Laws 1977, LB 346, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.122;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 12.

County Employees Retirement Act, see section 23-2331.